California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(2) The steps taken to provide notice to the child’s parents, custodians, and tribe about the hearing pursuant to this section.

(3) If the child’s parents and Indian custodians are unknown, a detailed explanation of what efforts have been made to locate and contact them, including contact with the appropriate Bureau of Indian Affairs regional director.

(4) The residence and the domicile of the Indian child.

(5) If either the residence or the domicile of
 the Indian child is believed to be on a reservation or in an Alaska Native village, the name of the tribe affiliated with that reservation or village.

(6) The tribal affiliation of the child and of the parents or Indian custodians.

(7) A specific and detailed account of the circumstances that caused the Indian child to be taken into temporary custody.

(8) If the child is believed to reside or be domiciled on a reservation in which the tribe exercises exclusive jurisdiction over child custody matters, a statement of efforts that have been made and that are being made to contact the tribe and transfer the child to the tribe’s jurisdiction.

(9) A statement of the efforts that have been taken to assist the parents or Indian custodians so the Indian child
 may safely be returned to their custody.

(10) The steps taken to consult and collaborate with the tribe and the outcome of that consultation and collaboration.

(c) (1) The court shall order the release of the child from custody unless a prima facie showing has been made that the child comes within Section 300, the court finds that continuance in the parent’s or guardian’s home is contrary to the child’s welfare, and any of the following circumstances exist:

(A) There is a substantial danger to the physical health of the child or the child is suffering severe emotional damage, and there are no reasonable means by which the child’s physical or emotional health may be protected without removing the child from the parent’s or guardian’s physical custody.

(B) There is substantial evidence that a parent, guardian, or custodian of the child is likely to flee the jurisdiction of the court, and, in the case of an Indian child, fleeing the jurisdiction will place the child at risk of imminent physical damage or harm.

(C) The child has left a placement in which the child was placed by the juvenile court.

(D) The child indicates an unwillingness to return home, if the child has been physically or sexually abused by a person residing in the home.

(2) (A) The court shall determine whether less disruptive alternatives to removal were considered by the agency, such as factors related to the impact of removal on the child, including, but not limited to, the following:

(i) A description of the relationship between the child and their parents, guardians, or Indian custodians, based on the child’s perspective, and the child’s response to removal and, where developmentally appropriate, their perspective on removal.

(ii) The relationship between the child and any siblings.

(iii) The relationship between the child and other members of the household.

(iv) Any disruption to the child’s schooling, social relationships, and physical or emotional health that may result from placement out of the home, and in the case of an Indian child, any impact on the child’s connection to their tribe, extended family members, and tribal community.

(B) If the court finds that
 removal is necessary under paragraph (1), the court shall, in a written order or on the record, set forth all of the following:

(i) The basis for its findings and the evidence relied on.

(ii) Its determination regarding the child’s placement, including whether it complies with the placement preferences set forth in Section 361.31, and less disruptive alternatives.

(iii) Include any orders necessary to alleviate any disruption or harm to the child resulting from removal.

(C) Nothing in this paragraph permits a child to be released to a parent, legal guardian, or Indian custodian, or to be placed in an unsafe placement, due solely to the court determining the child was not offered less disruptive alternatives.

(d) If the court knows or there is reason to know the child is an Indian child, the court may only detain the Indian child if it also finds that detention is necessary to prevent imminent physical damage or harm. The court shall state on the record the facts supporting this finding.

(e) (1) If the hearing pursuant to this section is continued pursuant to Section 322 or for any other reason, the court shall find that the continuance of the child in the parent’s or guardian’s home is contrary to the child’s welfare at the initial petition hearing or order the release of the child from custody.

(2) If the court knows or has reason to know the child is an Indian child, the hearing pursuant to this section may not be continued beyond 30 days unless the court finds all of the following:

(A) Restoring the child to the parent, parents, or Indian custodian would subject the child to imminent physical damage or harm.

(B) The court is unable to transfer the proceeding to the jurisdiction of the appropriate Indian tribe.

(C) It is not possible to initiate an Indian child custody proceeding as defined in Section 224.1.

(f) (1) The court shall also make a determination on the record, referencing the social worker’s report or other evidence relied upon, as to whether reasonable efforts were made to prevent or eliminate the need for removal of the child from their home, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 306, and whether there are available services that would prevent the need for further detention. Services to be
 considered for purposes of making this determination are case management, counseling, emergency shelter care, emergency in-home caretakers, out-of-home respite care, teaching and demonstrating homemakers, parenting training, transportation, and any other child welfare services authorized by the State Department of Social Services pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 16500) of Part 4 of Division 9. The court shall also review whether the social worker has considered whether a referral to public assistance services pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) and Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of, Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17000) of Part 5 of, and Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900) of Part 6 of, Division 9 would have eliminated the need to take temporary custody of the child or would prevent the need for further detention. This determination shall apply to each child individually, and the considerations shall be tailored to the individual child.

(2) If the court knows or has reason to know the child is an Indian child, the court shall also determine whether the county welfare department made active efforts to provide remedial services and rehabilitation programs designed to prevent the breakup of the Indian family. The court shall order the county welfare department to initiate or continue services or programs pending disposition pursuant to Section 358.

(3) If the child can be returned to the custody of their parent, guardian, or Indian custodian through the provision of those services, the court shall place the child with their parent, guardian, or Indian custodian and order that the services shall be provided. If the child cannot be returned to the physical custody of their parent or guardian, the court shall determine if there is a relative who is able and willing to care for the child, and has been assessed pursuant to
 Section 361.4.

(4) In order to preserve the bond between the child and the parent and to facilitate family reunification, the court shall consider whether the child can be returned to the custody of their parent who is enrolled in a certified substance abuse treatment facility that allows a dependent child to reside with their parent. The fact that the parent is enrolled in a certified substance abuse treatment facility that allows a dependent child to reside with their parent shall not be, for that reason alone, prima facie evidence of substantial danger. The court shall specify the factual basis for its conclusion that the return of the child to the custody of their parent would pose a substantial danger or would not pose a substantial danger to the physical health, safety, protection, or physical or emotional well-being of the child.

(g) If a court orders a child detained, the
 court shall state the facts on which the decision is based, specify why the initial removal was necessary, reference the social worker’s report or other evidence relied upon to make its determination whether continuance in the home of the parent or legal guardian is contrary to the child’s welfare, order temporary placement and care of the child to be vested with the county child welfare department pending the hearing held pursuant to Section 355 or further order of the court, and order services to be provided as soon as possible to reunify the child and their family, if appropriate.

(h) (1) (A) If the child is not released from custody, the court may order the temporary placement of the child in any of the following for a period not to exceed 15 judicial days:

(i) The home of a relative, or a nonrelative extended family member, as
 defined in Section 362.7, or, in the case of an Indian child, an extended family member, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 224.1, that has been assessed pursuant to Section 361.4.

(ii) The approved home of a resource family, as described in Section 16519.5, or a home licensed or approved by the Indian child’s tribe.

(iii) An emergency shelter or other suitable licensed place.

(iv) A place exempt from licensure designated by the juvenile court.

(B) A youth homelessness prevention center licensed by the State Department of Social Services pursuant to Section 1502.35 of the Health and Safety Code shall not be a placement option pursuant to this section.

(C) If the
 court knows or has reason to know that the child is an Indian child, the Indian child shall be detained in a home that complies with the placement preferences set forth in Section 361.31 and in the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.), unless the court finds good cause exists pursuant to Section 361.31 not to follow the placement preferences. If the court finds good cause not to follow the placement preferences for detention, this finding does not affect the requirement that a diligent search be made for a subsequent placement within the placement preferences.

(2) Relatives shall be given preferential consideration for placement of the child. As used in this section, “relative” means an adult who is related to the child by blood, adoption, or affinity within the fifth degree of kinship, including stepparents, stepsiblings, and all relatives whose status is preceded by the words “great,” “great-great,” or
 “grand,” or the spouse of any of these persons, even if the marriage was terminated by death or dissolution.

(3) When placing in the home of a relative, nonrelative extended family member, or, in the case of an Indian child, an extended family member, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 224.1, the court shall consider the recommendations of the social worker based on the assessment pursuant to Section 361.4 of the home of the relative, extended family member, or nonrelative extended family member, including the results of a criminal records check and prior child abuse allegations, if any, before ordering that the child be placed with a relative or nonrelative extended family member. The court may authorize the placement of a child on a temporary basis in the home of a relative, regardless of the status of any criminal record exemption or resource family approval, if the court finds that the placement does not pose a risk
 to the health and safety of the child. The court shall order the parent to disclose to the social worker the names, residences, and any known identifying information of any maternal or paternal relatives of the child. The social worker shall initiate the assessment pursuant to Section 361.3 of any relative to be considered for continuing placement.

(i) In the case of an Indian child, any order detaining the child pursuant to this section shall be considered an emergency removal under subdivision (g) of Section 305.5. The emergency proceeding shall terminate if the child is returned to the custody of the parent, parents, or Indian custodian, the child has been transferred to the custody and jurisdiction of the child’s tribe, or the agency or another party to the proceeding recommends that the child be removed from the physical custody of their parent or parents or Indian custodian pursuant to Section 361 or 361.2.

(j) (1) At the initial hearing upon the petition filed in accordance with subdivision (c) of Rule 5.520 of the California Rules of Court or anytime thereafter up until the time that the minor is adjudged a dependent child of the court or a finding is made dismissing the petition, the court may temporarily limit the right of the parent or guardian to make educational or developmental services decisions for the child and temporarily appoint a responsible adult to make educational or developmental services decisions for the child if all of the following conditions are found:

(A) The parent or guardian is unavailable, unable, or unwilling to exercise educational or developmental services rights for the child.

(B) The county placing agency has made diligent efforts to locate and secure the participation
 of the parent or guardian in educational or developmental services decisionmaking.

(C) The child’s educational and developmental services needs cannot be met without the temporary appointment of a responsible adult.

(2) If the court limits the parent’s educational rights under this subdivision, the court shall determine whether there is a responsible adult who is a relative, nonrelative extended family member, or other adult known to the child and who is available and willing to serve as the child’s educational representative before appointing an educational representative or surrogate who is not known to the child.

(3) If the court cannot identify a responsible adult to make educational decisions for the child and the appointment of a surrogate parent, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 56050 of the Education
 Code, is not warranted, the court may, with the input of any interested person, make educational decisions for the child. If the child is receiving services from a regional center, the provision of any developmental services related to the court’s decision shall be consistent with the child’s individual program plan and pursuant to the Lanterman Developmental Disabilities Services Act (Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500)). If the court cannot identify a responsible adult to make developmental services decisions for the child, the court may, with the input of any interested person, make developmental services decisions for the child. If the court makes educational or developmental services decisions for the child, the court shall also issue appropriate orders to ensure that every effort is made to identify a responsible adult to make future educational or developmental services decisions for the child.

(4) A temporary appointment of a
 responsible adult and temporary limitation on the right of the parent or guardian to make educational or developmental services decisions for the child shall be specifically addressed in the court order. An order made under this section shall expire at the conclusion of the hearing held pursuant to Section 361 or upon dismissal of the petition. Upon the entering of disposition orders, additional needed limitation on the parent’s or guardian’s educational or developmental services rights shall be addressed pursuant to Section 361.

(5) This section does not remove the obligation to appoint surrogate parents for students with disabilities who are without parental representation in special education procedures, as required by state and federal law, including Section 1415(b)(2) of Title 20 of the United States Code, Section 56050 of the Education Code, Section 7579.5 of the Government Code, and Rule 5.650 of the California Rules of Court.

(6) If the court appoints a developmental services decisionmaker pursuant to this section, the developmental services decisionmaker shall have the authority to access the child’s information and records pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 4514 and paragraph (23) of subdivision (a) of Section 5328, and to act on the child’s behalf for the purposes of the individual program plan process pursuant to Sections 4646, 4646.5, and 4648 and the fair hearing process pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 4700) of Division 4.5, and as set forth in the court order.

(k) For a placement made on or after October 1, 2021, each temporary placement of the child pursuant to subdivision (h) in a short-term residential therapeutic program shall comply with the requirements of Section 4096 and be reviewed by the court pursuant to Section 361.22.

(l) For a placement made on or after July 1, 2022, each temporary placement of the child pursuant to subdivision (h) in a community treatment facility shall comply with the requirements of Section 4096 and be reviewed by the court pursuant to Section 361.22.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 200, Sec. 27.   (AB 1521)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

319.1.

When the court finds a minor to be a person described by Section 300, and believes that the minor may need specialized mental health treatment while the minor is unable to reside in his or her natural home, the court shall notify the director of the county mental health department in the county where the minor resides. The county mental health department shall perform the duties required under Section 5694.7 for all those minors.

Nothing in this section shall restrict the provisions of emergency psychiatric services to those minors who are involved in dependency cases and have not yet reached the point of adjudication or disposition, nor shall it operate to restrict evaluations at an earlier stage of the proceedings or to restrict orders removing the minor from a detention facility for psychiatric treatment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 854, Sec. 70.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

319.2.

Notwithstanding Section 319, when a child under the age of six years is not released from the custody of the court, the child may be placed in a community care facility licensed as a group home for children or in a temporary shelter care facility, as defined in Section 1530.8 of the Health and Safety Code, only when the court finds that placement is necessary to secure a complete and adequate evaluation, including placement planning and transition time. The placement period shall not exceed 60 days unless a case plan has been developed and the need for additional time is documented in the case plan and has been approved by the deputy director or director of the county child welfare department or an assistant chief probation officer or chief probation officer of the
 county probation department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 21, Sec. 7.   (AB 74)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

319.3.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 319, a child who is the subject of a petition under Section 300 and who is 6 to 12 years of age, inclusive, may be placed in a community care facility licensed as a group home for children, a short-term residential therapeutic program, a community treatment facility, or a temporary shelter care facility, as defined in Section 1530.8 of the Health and Safety Code, only when the court finds that placement is necessary to secure a complete and adequate evaluation, including placement planning and transition time. The placement period in a group home for
 children, a short-term residential therapeutic program, or a community treatment facility shall not exceed 60 days unless a case plan has been developed and the need for additional time is documented in the case plan and has been approved by a deputy director or director of the county child welfare department or an assistant chief probation officer or chief probation officer of the county probation department. The placement period in a temporary shelter care facility shall not exceed 10 days.

(b) For a placement made on or after October 1, 2021, each placement of a child in a short-term residential therapeutic program pursuant to this section shall comply with the requirements of Section 4096 and be
 reviewed by the court pursuant to Section 361.22.

(c) For a placement made on or after July 1, 2022, each placement of a child in a community treatment facility pursuant to this section shall comply with the requirements of Section 4096 and be reviewed by the court pursuant to Section 361.22.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 50, Sec. 15.   (SB 187)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

319.4.

If it is known or if there is reason to know the child is an Indian child, and the child has been ordered detained pursuant to Section 319, any party may request an ex parte hearing prior to disposition to present evidence to the court that the emergency placement is no longer necessary to prevent imminent physical damage or harm to the child. If the court determines placement is no longer necessary, it shall order the child returned to the physical custody of the parent or parents or Indian custodian. The Judicial Council shall develop a rule of court and forms for implementation of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 833, Sec. 23.   (AB 3176)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

321.

When a hearing is held under the provisions of this article and no parent or guardian of the minor is present and no parent or guardian has had actual notice of the hearing, a parent or guardian of the minor may file an affidavit setting forth the facts with the clerk of the juvenile court and the clerk shall immediately set the matter for rehearing at a time within 24 hours, excluding Sundays and nonjudicial days from the filing of the affidavit. Upon the rehearing, the court shall proceed in the same manner as upon the original hearing.

If the minor, a parent or guardian or the minor’s attorney or guardian ad litem, if either one or the other has been appointed by the court, requests evidence of the prima facie case, a rehearing shall be held within three judicial days to consider evidence of the prima facie case. If the prima facie case is not established, the minor shall be released from detention.

In lieu of a requested rehearing, the court may set the matter for trial within 10 days.

When the court ascertains that the rehearing cannot be held within three judicial days because of the unavailability of a witness, a reasonable continuance may be granted for a period not to exceed five judicial days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 216.)
-------------------------------------------

322.

Upon motion of the minor or a parent or guardian of such minor, the court shall continue any hearing or rehearing held under the provisions of this article for one day, excluding Sundays and nonjudicial days.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

323.

Upon any hearing or rehearing under the provisions of this article, the court may order such minor or any parent or guardian of such minor who is present in court to again appear before the court, the probation officer or the county financial evaluation officer at a time and place specified in said order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1485, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

324.

Whenever any minor is taken into temporary custody under the provisions of this article in any county other than the county in which the minor is alleged to be within or to come within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court, which county is referred to herein as the requesting county, the officer who has taken the minor into temporary custody may notify the law enforcement agency in the requesting county of the fact that the minor is in custody. When a law enforcement officer, of such requesting county files a petition pursuant to Section 332 with the clerk of the juvenile court of his respective county and secures a warrant therefrom, he shall forward said warrant, or a telegraphic copy thereof to the officer who has the minor in temporary custody as soon as possible within 48 hours, excluding Sundays and nonjudicial days, from the time said juvenile was taken into temporary custody. Thereafter an officer from said requesting county shall take custody of the minor within five days, in the county in which the minor is in temporary custody, and shall take the minor before the juvenile court judge who issued the warrant, or before some other juvenile court of the same county without unnecessary delay. If the minor is not brought before a judge of the juvenile court within the period prescribed by this section, he must be released from custody.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

324.5.

(a) Whenever allegations of physical or sexual abuse of a child come to the attention of a local law enforcement agency or the local child welfare department and the child is taken into protective custody, the local law enforcement agency, or child welfare department may, as soon as practically possible, consult with a medical practitioner, who has specialized training in detecting and treating child abuse injuries and neglect, to determine whether a physical examination of the child is appropriate. If deemed appropriate, the local law enforcement agency, or the child welfare department, shall cause the child to undergo a physical examination performed by a medical practitioner who has specialized training in detecting and treating child abuse injuries and neglect, and, whenever possible, shall ensure that this examination take place within 72 hours of the time the child was taken into protective custody. In the event the allegations are made while the child is in custody, the physical examination shall be performed within 72 hours of the time the allegations were made.

In the case of a petition filed pursuant to Section 319, the department shall provide the results of the physical examination to the court and to any counsel for the minor, and counsel for the parent or guardian of the minor. Failure to obtain this physical examination shall not be grounds to deny a petition under this section.

(b) The local child welfare agency shall, whenever possible, request that additional medical examinations to determine child abuse injuries or neglect, be performed by the same medical practitioner who performed the examinations described in subdivision (a). If it is not possible to obtain additional medical examinations, the local child welfare agency shall ensure that future medical practitioners to whom the child has been referred for ongoing diagnosis and treatment have specialized training in detecting and treating child abuse injuries and neglect and have access to the child’s medical records covering the current and previous incidents of child abuse.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 949, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Dependent Children—Commencement of Proceedings [325. - 342.]

325.

A proceeding in the juvenile court to declare a child to be a dependent child of the court is commenced by the filing with the court, by the social worker, of a petition, in conformity with the requirements of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1054, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

326.5.

The Judicial Council shall adopt a rule of court effective July 1, 2001, that complies with the requirement of the federal Child Abuse Prevention and Treatment Act (Public Law 93-247) for the appointment of a guardian ad litem, who may be an attorney or a court-appointed special advocate, for a child in cases in which a petition is filed based upon neglect or abuse of the child or in which a prosecution is initiated under the Penal Code arising from neglect or abuse of the child. The rule of court may include guidelines to the courts for determining when an attorney should be appointed rather than a court appointed special advocate, and caseload standards for guardians ad litem.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 450, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

326.7.

Appointment of a guardian ad litem shall not be required for a minor who is a parent of the child who is the subject of the dependency petition, unless the minor parent is unable to understand the nature of the proceedings or to assist counsel in preparing the case.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 181, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

327.

Either the juvenile court in the county in which a minor resides or in the county where the minor is found or in the county in which the acts take place or the circumstances exist which are alleged to bring such minor within the provisions of Section 300, is the proper court to commence proceedings under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

328.

(a) If the social worker has cause to believe that there was or is within the county, or residing in the county, a person described in Section 300, the social worker shall immediately make any investigation the social worker deems necessary to determine whether child welfare services should be offered to the family and whether proceedings in the juvenile court should be commenced. If the social worker determines that it is appropriate to offer child welfare services to the family, the social worker shall make a referral to these services pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 16500) of Part 4 of Division 9. An inference regarding the credibility of the allegations or the need for child welfare services shall not be drawn from the mere existence
 of a child custody or visitation dispute.

(1) This subdivision does not require an investigation by the social worker with respect to a child delivered or referred to any agency pursuant to Section 307.5.

(2) The social worker shall interview any child four years of age or older who is a subject of an investigation, and who is in juvenile hall or other custodial facility, or has been removed to a foster home, to ascertain the child’s view of the home environment. If proceedings are commenced, the social worker shall include the substance of the interview in any written report submitted at an adjudicatory hearing, or if no report is then received in evidence, the social worker shall include the substance of the interview in the social study required by Section 358. A referral
 based on allegations of child abuse from the family court pursuant to Section 3027 of the Family Code shall be investigated to the same extent as any other child abuse allegation.

(b) (1) The State Department of Social Services shall submit a report to the Legislature that includes all of the following data:

(A) The number of children in the care and custody of all county placing agencies pursuant to a voluntary placement agreement, as defined in
 subdivision (p) of Section 11400.

(B) The number of child welfare agency investigations that resulted in a written plan for care of a child outside the home of the parent that is not a voluntary placement agreement, as described in subparagraph (A).

(C) The number of children identified in subparagraphs (A) and (B) for whom a subsequent report is made by child protective services within one year of initial contact with the county agency, including whether the reports were substantiated, unsubstantiated, or inconclusive.

(D) The number of children identified in subparagraphs (A) and (B) for whom a dependency court petition is filed within one year of the date of the voluntary placement agreement or written plan for
 care.

(2) The department shall stratify the data required pursuant to paragraph (1) by a variety of demographic characteristics, including, at a minimum, by race and income level to the extent allowable to protect confidentiality.

(3) The report shall be submitted to the Legislature on or before January 1, 2025, or 15 months after the date the department notifies the Legislature that the Child Welfare Services – California Automated Response and Engagement System (CWS-CARES) can perform the necessary automation to implement the new data fields described in paragraph (1). The report shall be submitted to the Legislature in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 780, Sec. 1.   (AB 2309)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

328.1.

(a) A county child welfare department investigating a case of child abuse or neglect involving an allegation against the parent or guardian of the child shall attempt, as soon as practicable, to determine if the parent or guardian is an active duty member of the Armed Forces of the United States.

(b) A county child welfare department may develop and adopt memoranda of understanding with military installations, located in whole or in part within the borders of its jurisdiction, that govern the investigation of allegations of child abuse or neglect against active duty service members assigned to units on those installations. Those memoranda may include, but are not limited to,
 all of the following:

(1) To whom, how, and when each party would report information about an investigation.

(2) Each party’s role and responsibilities when conducting an investigation and in providing child maltreatment prevention or rehabilitative services to a family in response to the results of the investigations, consistent with state and federal law.

(3) Protocols describing what, if any, confidential information may be shared between the parties and for what purposes, in accordance with applicable state and federal law.

(c) This section does not limit or change the responsibilities of a county child welfare department with respect to investigations of, or responses to, allegations of abuse or neglect.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 233, Sec. 1.   (SB 907)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

328.2.

The State Department of Social Services shall update all regulations, all-county letters, and other instructions relating to the investigation of a minor who may be described by Section 300 to ensure that, when a social worker is investigating an alleged case of child abuse or neglect, a parent’s or guardian’s use or possession of cannabis is treated in the same manner as a parent’s or guardian’s use or possession of alcohol and legally prescribed medication.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 260, Sec. 1.   (AB 2595)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

328.3.

Whenever any officer refers or delivers a minor pursuant to Section 307.5, the agency to which the minor is referred shall immediately make such investigation as it deems necessary to determine what disposition of the referral or delivery should be made. If the referral agency does not initiate a service program on behalf of a minor referred to the agency within 20 calendar days, or initiate a service program on behalf of a minor delivered to the agency within 10 calendar days, that agency shall immediately notify the referring officer of that decision in writing. The referral agency shall retain a copy of that written notification for 30 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 260, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

329.

(a) When a person applies to the social worker to commence proceedings in the juvenile court, the application shall be in the form of an affidavit alleging that there was or is within the county, or residing therein, a child within the provisions of Section 300, and setting forth facts in support thereof. The social worker shall immediately investigate as necessary to determine whether proceedings in the juvenile court should be commenced. If the social worker does not take action under Section 301 and does not file a petition in the juvenile court within three weeks after the application, the social worker shall endorse upon the affidavit of the applicant the decision not to proceed further, including any recommendation made to the applicant, if one
 is made, to consider commencing a probate guardianship proceeding for the child, and the reasons therefor and shall immediately notify the applicant of the action taken or the decision rendered under this section. The social worker shall retain the affidavit and the endorsement thereon for a period of 30 days after notifying the applicant.

(b) (1) If a social worker receives a referral from the probate court pursuant to Section 1513 of the Probate Code, the social worker shall immediately investigate as necessary to determine whether proceedings in the juvenile court should be commenced.

(2) The social worker shall, within three weeks of the referral, report the findings and conclusions of the investigation, along with any decision made as a result and the
 reasons for the decision, to the probate court as required by subdivision (b) of Section 1513 of the Probate Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 578, Sec. 4.   (AB 260)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

331.

(a) If a person has applied to the social worker, pursuant to Section 329, to commence juvenile court proceedings and the social worker does not file a petition within three weeks after the application, the person may, within one month after making the application, apply to the juvenile court to review the decision of the social worker, and the court may either affirm the decision of the social worker or, if it finds that the child is, prima facie, described by Section 300, order the social worker to commence juvenile court proceedings.

(b) If the probate court has referred a matter to the child welfare agency pursuant to Section 1513 of the Probate
 Code, and the agency does not file a petition to commence juvenile court proceedings within three weeks of the referral, the probate court or counsel appointed by the probate court pursuant to Section 1470 of the Probate Code to represent the child may, within one month after the referral, request that the juvenile court review the decision of the social worker not to file a petition. The request shall contain the probate court referral made pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1513 of the Probate Code and the social worker’s report, if available to the court, and need not contain any additional information. The juvenile court may either affirm the decision of the social worker or, if it finds that the child is, prima facie, described by Section 300, order the social worker to commence juvenile court proceedings.

(1) Either the
 appointment of a temporary probate guardian or any delay attributable to the child welfare investigation shall not
 preclude the juvenile court from ordering the social worker to commence dependency proceedings or from hearing and determining a petition alleging that the child is described by Section 300.
